Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Arbitration agreement" means an agreement that subjects a family law dispute to arbitration.

(2) "Arbitration organization" means an association, agency, board, commission, or other entity that is neutral and initiates, sponsors, or administers an arbitration or is involved in the selection of an arbitrator.

(3) "Arbitrator" means an individual selected, alone or with others, to make an award in a family law dispute that is subject to an arbitration agreement.

(4) "Child-related dispute" means a family law dispute regarding legal custody, physical custody, custodial responsibility, parental responsibility or authority, parenting time, right to access, visitation, or financial support regarding a child.

(5) "Court" means the family court.

(6) "Family law dispute" means a contested issue arising under the domestic relations law of this state.

(7) "Party" means an individual who signs an arbitration agreement and whose rights will be determined by an award.

(8) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal entity.

(9) "Record," used as a noun, means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(10) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

(11) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States. The term includes a federally recognized Indian tribe.

[ 2023 c 61 s 2.]